Utah statutes.
78B-9-102.   Replacement of prior remedies.
(1)  This chapter establishes the sole remedy for any person who challenges a
conviction or sentence for a criminal offense and who has exhausted all other
legal remedies, including a direct appeal except as provided in Subsection
(2).  This chapter replaces all prior remedies for review, including
extraordinary or common law writs.  Proceedings under this chapter are civil
and are governed by the rules of civil procedure.  Procedural provisions for
filing and commencement of a petition are found in Rule 65C, Utah Rules of
Civil Procedure.
(2)  This chapter does not apply to:
(a)  habeas corpus petitions that do not challenge a conviction or sentence
for a criminal offense;
(b)  motions to correct a sentence pursuant to Rule 22(e), Utah Rules of
Criminal Procedure; or
(c)  actions taken by the Board of Pardons and Parole.
